Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-362
Permit, defined.

Permit shall mean to allow a vulnerable adult over whom one has a proximate or direct degree of control to perform an act or acts or be in a situation which the controlling person could have prevented by the reasonable exercise of such control.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 15.